Hawaii statutes.
[§201H-18] Public works contracts. The
corporation may make, execute, and carry out contracts for, or in connection
with, any housing project in the manner provided under chapter 103D and section
103-53; provided that with regard to the contracts, the term
"officers", as used in chapter 103D, shall mean the corporation or
officer authorized by the corporation to act as its contracting officer.
Unless made and executed in the name of the State, each contract made and
executed as authorized in this section shall state therein that it is so made
and executed. [L 2005, c 196, pt of §20; am L 2006, c 180, §15]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next